Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 2

Agricultural Cooperative Associations

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

2-2-101. Purpose.

The purposes of this subchapter are to provide for:

The formation and operation of agricultural cooperative associations; and

The rights, powers, liabilities, and duties of cooperative associations.

Associations organized under this subchapter shall be deemed to be nonprofit, inasmuch as they are not organized for the purpose of making profits for themselves or for their members as proprietors, but only for their members as patrons and employees of the associations.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1001.

2-2-102. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agricultural products” means horticultural, viticultural, forestry, dairy, livestock, poultry, bee, and any other farm, ranch, plantation, and range products;

“Association” means any association organized under this subchapter;

“Member” means a member of record as determined under the articles of association and bylaws of an association. The term “member” shall include the holder of a membership in an association without capital stock and the holder of common stock in an association organized with capital stock; and

“Person” means individuals, firms, partnerships, corporations, and associations.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 2; 1981, No. 121, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1002.

2-2-103. Construction.

Any provisions of law which otherwise would be in conflict with this subchapter shall not be construed as applying to an association provided for in this subchapter.

No provision of law shall be deemed to be repealed by this subchapter.

This subchapter shall not affect the provisions of the Cooperative Marketing Act, § 2-2-401 et seq.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 26; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1025.

2-2-104. Who may organize.

Any number of persons, not less than five (5), who are engaged in the production of agricultural commodities may form a cooperative association with or without capital stock under the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1003.

2-2-105. Reasons for organizing.

An association may be organized to engage in any agricultural or related activity, including, but without limitation, any activity in connection with the producing, marketing, selling, harvesting, dairying, preserving, drying, processing, canning, packing, milling, ginning, compressing, storing, transporting, handling, or utilization of any agricultural or forestry products produced by it or delivered to it by its members or others; with the manufacturing or marketing of the by-products thereof, or in connection with the purchase, hiring, or use by it or its members or others of supplies, machinery, or equipment; in the acquisition or improvement of land; in the construction or maintenance of houses, barns, sheds, or facilities for its use or the use of its members; for indemnifying or replacing damaged, lost, or destroyed livestock or other tangible personal property pertaining to agriculture belonging to its members; in burial activities; or the furnishing of medical, dental, health, hospitalization, nursing, or any related services, or medicines or medical supplies to its members and their families.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1004.

2-2-106. Powers.

Each association incorporated under this subchapter shall have the following powers:

To engage in any activity in connection with any agricultural or related activity, including, but without limitation, any activity in connection with the producing, marketing, selling, harvesting, dairying, preserving, drying, processing, canning, packing, milling, ginning, compressing, storing, transporting, handling, or utilization of any agricultural or forestry products produced by it or delivered to it by its members or others; with the manufacturing or marketing of the by-products thereof; in connection with the purchase, hiring, or use by it or its members or others of supplies, machinery, or equipment; in the acquisition or improvement of land; in the construction or maintenance of houses, barns, sheds, or facilities for its use or the use of its members; for indemnifying or replacing damaged, lost, or destroyed livestock or other tangible personal property pertaining to agriculture belonging to its members; in burial activities; or the furnishing of medical, dental, health, hospitalization, nursing, or any related services, or medicines or medical supplies to its members and their families;

To borrow money and to make advances to members;

To establish funds in pools for the purposes of indemnifying or replacing damaged, lost, or destroyed livestock or other tangible personal property pertaining to agriculture belonging to members.

Associations organized under this subchapter which shall engage in the activities enumerated in this subdivision (3) shall not be deemed to be insurance companies and shall not be subject to the insurance laws of Arkansas;

To purchase or otherwise acquire and to hold, own, and exercise all rights of ownership in, and to sell, transfer, or pledge or guarantee the payment of dividends or interest on, or the retirement or redemption of shares of the capital stock or bonds of any corporation or association engaged in any related activity or in the production, warehousing, handling, or marketing of any of the products of the type handled by the association;

To establish reserves and to invest those funds in bonds or such other property as may be provided in the bylaws;

To purchase or otherwise acquire or to buy, hold, and exercise all privileges of ownership or tenancy over such real and personal property as may be necessary or convenient for the conducting and operating of any of the business of the association or incidental thereto;

To arrange medical, dental, health, surgical, nursing, hospitalization, and related services and benefits for the members and families of the members.

Associations organized under this subchapter for the purposes specified in this subdivision (7) shall not be deemed to be insurance companies and shall not be subject to the insurance laws of Arkansas;

To do each and every thing necessary, suitable, or proper for the accomplishment of any of the purposes or the attainment of any one (1) or more of the objects enumerated in this section, or conducive to or expedient for the interest or benefit of the association, and to contract accordingly.

In addition, to exercise and possess all powers, rights, and privileges necessary or incidental to the purposes for which the association is organized or to the activities in which it is engaged, and to do any such thing anywhere;

To contract and to sue and be sued; and

To act as agent or representative of any members or others in any of the activities enumerated in this section.

The manufacture of wine does not come within the purview of this section. Altus Coop. Winery v. Morley, 218 Ark. 492, 237 S.W.2d 481 (1951).

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1006.

2-2-107. Members.

Under the terms and conditions prescribed in its bylaws, an association formed under this subchapter may admit any persons as members who are engaged in the production of agricultural commodities, including the lessees and tenants of lands used for production of agricultural commodities and lessors and landlords who receive as rent all or part of the crops raised on the leased premises, and issue certificates of common stock or membership to them.

Certificates of stock or membership shall not be transferable except as provided in the articles of association or the bylaws. No person shall otherwise acquire, by operation of law or otherwise, the benefits of membership except as provided in this subchapter.

If a member of any association organized under this subchapter is other than a natural person, the member may be represented by any individual, associate, officer, manager, or member thereof, duly authorized in writing.

Sharecropper who received part of proceeds of cotton crop delivered to cooperative gin would, under articles and bylaws of association, share in the patronage payments regardless of whether he or she was a stockholder or member of the cooperative, in the absence of any contract to the contrary. Houck v. Birmingham, 217 Ark. 449, 230 S.W.2d 952 (1950).

Sharecroppers and tenants were entitled to claim refunds where cotton gin cooperative realized a profit. Collie v. Coleman, 223 Ark. 206, 265 S.W.2d 515 (1954).

The name of the association;

The purposes for which it is formed;

The place where its principal business will be transacted, which shall be its domicile;

The term for which it is to exist, which may be perpetual;

The number of directors thereof, which must not be fewer than five (5) and may be any number in excess thereof, and the term of office of the directors;

If organized without capital stock, the classes of membership, if more than one (1) class of membership is authorized, and the rules determining the property rights of all classes of members in the event of dissolution; and

If organized with capital stock, the amount of stock and the number of shares into which it is divided and the par value thereof.

The capital stock may be divided into preferred and common stock.

If so divided, the articles of association must contain a statement of the number of shares of stock to which preference is granted, the nature and definite extent of the preference and privileges granted to each, and the number of shares of stock to which no preference is granted.

The articles must be subscribed by the incorporators and acknowledged by them before an officer authorized by the law of this state to take and certify acknowledgments. They shall be filed and recorded in the office of the Secretary of State.

The articles of association may be altered or amended at any regular or special meeting of the stockholders or members called for that purpose.

Amendments to the articles of association, when so adopted, shall be certified by the president and secretary of the association and shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(1)Each association incorporated under this subchapter must adopt for its government and management a code of bylaws not inconsistent with the articles of association or the powers granted in this subchapter.

The time, place, and manner of calling and conducting its meetings;

The number of stockholders or members constituting a quorum;

The right of members or stockholders to vote; and

The conditions, manner, form, and effect of such votes;

The number of directors constituting a quorum;

The qualifications, duties, and terms of office of directors and officers;

The time of their election; and

The mode and manner of giving notice thereof;

Penalties for violations of the bylaws;

The form and manner of amendment of bylaws;

The amount of entrance, organization, and membership fees, if any;

The manner and method of collection of the fees; and

The purposes for which they may be used;

The amount which each member or stockholder shall be required to pay annually or from time to time, if at all, to carry on the business of the association;

The charge, if any, to be paid by each member or stockholder for services rendered by the association to him or her and the time of payment and the manner of collection; and

The producing, marketing, renting, leasing, or other contract between the association and its members or stockholders, which every member or stockholder may be required to sign; and

The qualifications of members or stockholders of the association and the conditions precedent to membership or ownership of common and preferred stock;

The method, time, and manner of permitting members to withdraw;

The manner of assignment and transfer of the interest of members and of the shares of common and preferred stock;

The conditions upon which and the time when membership of any member shall cease;

The mode, manner, and effect of the expulsion of a member;

The manner of determining the value of a member's or stockholder's interest and the provision for its purchase by the association upon the death or withdrawal of a member or stockholder or upon the expulsion of a member or forfeiture of his or her membership;

The method, time, and manner of allotment and distribution of surpluses;

The manner and method of removal from office of any officer or director of the association; and

The manner and method of filling vacancies.

(1)For the purpose of amending the articles of association or for the purpose of amending the bylaws of the association, or for both purposes, a quorum for any stockholders' meeting for all associations organized under this subchapter shall be members or voting stockholders representing five percent (5%) of the voting power of the association who shall be present in person or voting by proxy.

For the purpose of amending articles of association or for the purpose of amending bylaws of the association, or for both purposes, a majority vote of the votes cast at a meeting at which a quorum is present, in person or by proxy, shall be sufficient to adopt amendments.

Cited: Robertson v. White, 635 F. Supp. 851 (W.D. Ark. 1986).

The bylaws may provide for an executive committee and may allot to the committee all the functions and powers of the board of directors, subject to the general direction and control of the board.

Cited: Robertson v. White, 635 F. Supp. 851 (W.D. Ark. 1986).

For purposes of this subchapter or any other law which is applied to an association formed under this subchapter, if permitted by the articles of association or the bylaws of the association, any vote of a member or stockholder may be made in person or by proxy and may be counted in the establishment of a quorum.

No stockholder of a cooperative association organized under this subchapter shall own more than one-twentieth (1/20) of the common stock of the association or more than one (1) share of common stock if there are fewer than twenty (20) common stockholders.

Such an association, in its bylaws, may limit the amount of common stock which one (1) member may own to any amount less than one-twentieth (1/20) of the common stock.

Any association organized with stock under this subchapter may issue preferred stock, with or without the right to vote.

The stock may be redeemable or retirable by the association on such terms and conditions as may be provided for by the articles of association and printed on the face of the certificate.

No association shall issue stock or a membership certificate to a member until it has been fully paid for.

The promissory notes of the members may be accepted by the association as full or partial payment.

The association shall hold the stock or membership certificate as security for the payment of the note, but such retention as security shall not affect the member's right to vote.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1007.

2-2-108. Articles of association.

Each association formed under this subchapter must prepare and file articles of association, setting forth:

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1008.

2-2-109. Amendments to articles.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1009.

2-2-110. Bylaws — Amendment of articles or bylaws.

A majority vote of the incorporators and members or stockholders or their written assent is necessary to adopt the bylaws.

Each association under its bylaws may provide without limitation for any or all of the following matters:

As to all other association business, the quorum established by the stockholders or members as authorized in subdivision (a)(3)(B) of this section, which may include members or stockholders voting in person or by proxy, shall govern.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 10; 1963, No. 90, § 1; 1983, No. 163, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1010.

2-2-111. Regular and special meetings.

In its bylaws, each association shall provide for one (1) or more regular meetings annually.

(1)The board of directors shall have the right to call a special meeting at any time. Members or stockholders holding ten percent (10%) of the voting power may file a petition with the chair of the board stating the specific business to be brought before the association and demand a special meeting at any time.

These meetings must be called by the board.

(1)Notice of all meetings, together with a statement of the purposes thereof, shall be mailed to each member at least five (5) days before the meeting.

The bylaws may require instead that the notice may be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation, published at the principal place of business of the association. If no newspaper is published at that place, notice may be given in a newspaper having circulation at the principal place of business of the association.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 11; 1983, No. 163, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1011.

2-2-112. Board of directors.

(1)The affairs of the association shall be managed by a board of not less than five (5) directors.

(A)(i)The bylaws may provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts and that the directors shall be elected according to the districts.

In such cases, the bylaws shall specify the number of directors to be elected by each district and the manner and method of reapportioning the directors and redistricting the territory covered by the association. The bylaws may provide for a quorum of the directors in each district.

The bylaws may provide that primary elections should be held in each district to elect the directors apportioned to the districts, and the results of all the primary elections must be ratified by the next regular meeting of the association or may be considered final as to the association.

The bylaws may provide that one (1) or more directors may be appointed by the Governor, the Dean of the College of Agriculture of the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville, or any other designated federal or state public official or commission.

(1)Where not otherwise prohibited by the bylaws, the directors of the association may provide a fair remuneration for the time actually spent by its officers, directors, and employees in its service.

No director, during the term of his or her office, shall be a party to a contract for profit with the association differing in any way from the business relations accorded regular members or holders of common stock of the association.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1012.

2-2-113. Officers.

The board of directors shall elect a president, one (1) or more vice presidents, a secretary, and a treasurer, and they may combine the two (2) latter officers and designate the combined office as secretary-treasurer.

(1)The treasurer may be a bank or any depository, and as such shall not be considered as an officer but as a functionary of the board.

In such case, the secretary shall perform the usual accounting duties of the treasurer, excepting that the funds shall be deposited only as authorized by the board.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1013.

2-2-114. Certificates of membership or stock.

When a member of an association established without capital stock has paid his or her membership fee in full, he or she shall receive a certificate of membership.

Except for debts lawfully contracted between the member and the association, no member shall be liable for the debts of the association to an amount exceeding the sum remaining unpaid on his or her membership fee or his or her subscription to the capital stock, including any unpaid balance on any promissory notes given in payment thereof.

(1)Unless provided otherwise in the articles of association or bylaws of an association, no member or stockholder shall be entitled to more than one (1) vote.

In an election for directors, the number of votes a member or stockholder is entitled to cast may be multiplied by the number of directors being elected. The member or stockholder may distribute the votes among as many candidates as he or she shall see fit.

Any provision of this subchapter or any other law which is applied to an association organized under this subchapter, referring to requirements for a vote or quorum based on a total number or proportion of members or stockholders, shall mean the number or proportion of the votes entitled to be cast by the members or stockholders where an association's articles of association or bylaws entitle any member to more than one (1) vote.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 14; 1983, No. 163, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1014.

2-2-115. Matters referred to membership.

Upon demand of one-third (1/3) of the entire board of directors, any matter that has been approved or passed by the board must be referred to the entire membership or the stockholders for decision at the next special or regular meeting. A special meeting may be called for that purpose.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1015.

2-2-116. Marketing contracts — Participation agreements.

Upon resolution adopted by its board of directors, any association may enter into all necessary and proper contracts and agreements and make all necessary and proper stipulations, agreements, contracts, and arrangements with its members, other persons, cooperatives, corporations, or associations formed in this or any other state for the cooperative and more economical carrying on of its business or any parts of its business.

Any two (2) or more associations by agreement between them may unite in employing and using or may expressly employ and use the same methods, means, and agencies for carrying on and conducting their respective businesses.

In addition to or in lieu of the marketing contracts authorized in subsection (a) of this section, the association and its members or others may make and execute any other type of participation agreement in cases in which the association will engage in other than marketing activities as authorized under this subchapter.

Contract between taxpayer and cooperative association to defer payment for rice could be construed as establishing association as taxpayer's agent rather than providing for sale of rice to association. Oliver v. United States, 193 F. Supp. 930 (E.D. Ark. 1961).

Sharecroppers and tenants were entitled to claim refunds where cotton gin cooperative company realized a profit; where rental contracts were silent as to refunds, burden of proof was upon principal stockholder landlord to show that tenants waived refunds. Collie v. Coleman, 223 Ark. 206, 265 S.W.2d 515 (1954).

In any civil action, upon any marketing contract of any member with any association existing under this subchapter, it shall be conclusively presumed that the products produced by any person, firm, or corporation during the period of time covered by the marketing contract, on the land of the member, however and by whomsoever produced, are the products of the member. As such, the products of the member are subject to the marketing contract if the products have been grown or acquired under any contract between the member and the other person, firm, or corporation entered into after the execution of the marketing contract. In such actions, the remedies for nondelivery or breach shall lie and be enforceable against the persons, firms, or corporations.

Where an action was brought under this subchapter and the matters relating thereto were finally determined adversely to the appellant on a prior appeal, it became the law of the case and a second case could not be considered. Collie v. Coleman, 226 Ark. 692, 292 S.W.2d 80 (1956).

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1016.

2-2-117. Remedies for breach of bylaws or contracts.

(1)The bylaws or the marketing or participation contract of any association existing under this subchapter may fix specific sums as liquidated damages to be paid by the member or stockholder to the association upon the breach or threatened breach by him or her of any provision of the participation agreement or upon the breach or threatened breach by him or her of any provision of the marketing contract regarding the sale or delivery or withholding of products.

These instruments may further provide that the member will pay all costs, premiums for bonds, expenses, and fees in case any action is brought upon the contract by the association.

These provisions shall be valid and enforceable in the courts of this state, and the clauses providing for liquidated damages shall be enforceable as such and shall not be regarded as penalties.

(1)In the event of any breach or threatened breach of the marketing contract by a member or other person, the association shall be entitled to an injunction to prevent the breach or further breach of the contract and to a decree of specific performance of the contract.

(A)Pending the adjudication of the action and upon filing a verified complaint showing the breach or threatened breach and upon filing a bond in the sum of one hundred dollars ($100), the association shall be entitled to an injunction against the member or other person.

The judge, in his or her discretion, may increase the bond to five hundred dollars ($500), after a hearing on five (5) days' notice to the parties if justice demands an increase in the amount of the bond.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1017.

2-2-118. Penalties for inducing breach of contract.

Any person or any corporation whose officers or employees knowingly induce or attempt to induce any person to breach his or her marketing or participation contract with an association shall be guilty of a violation and upon conviction shall be subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the offense and shall be liable to the association aggrieved in a civil suit in the penal sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1021; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 3.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “violation and upon conviction” for “misdemeanor”.

2-2-119. General corporation laws.

The provisions of the general corporation laws of this state, and all powers and rights thereunder, shall apply to the associations organized under this subchapter, except where the provisions are in conflict with or inconsistent with the express provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1018.

Cross References. Business Corporation Act of 1987, §4-27-101 et seq.

General corporation laws, §4-26-101 et seq.

2-2-120. Interest in similar entities.

An association organized or existing under this subchapter may organize, form, operate, own, control, have an interest in, own stock of, or be a member of any corporation or association, with or without capital stock, engaged in any of the activities authorized under this subchapter, whether formed under this subchapter or any other law of this or any other state.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1019.

2-2-121. Existing entities may participate.

Any corporation or association organized under previously existing statutes for purposes authorized in this subchapter, which are otherwise eligible under the provisions of this subchapter, may be brought under the provisions of this subchapter by a majority vote of its stockholders or members.

It shall make out in duplicate a statement signed and sworn to by the president or vice president and secretary to the effect that the corporation or association has decided, by a majority vote of its stockholders or members, to accept the benefits and be bound by the provisions of this subchapter. The statement shall be filed with the charter or articles of association.

The charter or articles of association of the corporation or association shall be amended, if necessary, to comply with the provisions of this subchapter. The charter or articles of association shall be filed as required in this subchapter, except that they shall be signed by a majority of the members of the board of directors.

The bylaws of the corporation or association shall also be amended, if necessary, to comply with the provisions of this subchapter.

The filing fee for filing the statement and charter or articles of association shall be the same as for filing an amendment to the articles of association.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1020.

2-2-122. Arrangements not in restraint of trade.

No association organized or existing under this subchapter shall be deemed to be a combination in restraint of trade or an illegal monopoly or an attempt to lessen competition or fix prices arbitrarily, nor shall the marketing or participation contracts or agreements between the association and its members or others or any agreements authorized by this subchapter be considered illegal or in restraint of trade.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 22; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1022.

2-2-123. Annual license fee — Taxation.

Each association organized or existing under this subchapter shall pay an annual license fee of ten dollars ($10.00) to the Secretary of State.

In addition, each association shall be subject to the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, as amended, § 26-52-101 et seq., and the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949, as amended, § 26-53-101 et seq., and all other taxes levied in this state. However, any association which immediately distributes at the close of each business year all surpluses by cash or certificate to its members shall not be subject to the Income Tax Act of 1929, § 26-51-101 et seq., with respect to the income.

Each association shall be subject to taxes upon its real estate and personal property.

To be exempt from license and privilege taxes, an association must be acting within powers granted to it. Altus Coop. Winery v. Morley, 218 Ark. 492, 237 S.W.2d 481 (1951).

Nonprofit agriculture cooperative was exempt from the corporate franchise tax although 1969 amendment to this section removed cooperative's exemptions from some other state taxes, as tax statute must be made expressly applicable to entity and mere removal of some tax exemptions did not allow levying of franchise tax on nonprofit cooperative. Jefferson Coop. Gin, Inc. v. Milam, 255 Ark. 479, 500 S.W.2d 932 (1973).

Association is not entitled to manufacture wine from grapes grown by its members and then sell the wine at wholesale without paying privilege taxes imposed on other wineries. Altus Coop. Winery v. Morley, 218 Ark. 492, 237 S.W.2d 481 (1951).

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 24; 1969, No. 311, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1023.

2-2-124. Filing fees.

For filing articles of association, an association organized under this subchapter shall pay five dollars ($5.00), and it shall pay two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) for filing an amendmentto the articles.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 153, § 25; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1024.

Subchapter 2

— Cotton Associations

Effective Dates. Acts 1939, No. 12, § 3: effective on passage.

2-2-201. Membership.

A person, firm, or corporation shall become a member of a cotton cooperative association organized and domesticated under the laws of the State of Arkansas only when the membership contract shall be in duplicate and shall state the time of the duration of each contract signed both by the member and the association.

The signature of any person on a draft or check containing conditions which purport to make a person a member of a cotton cooperative association as a prerequisite to obtaining money on any draft or check given to him or her for any cotton which he or she has sold or pledged to any cotton cooperative association shall not be construed as making the person a member of the association, even though he or she has signed or endorsed the check or draft.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “a Class A misdemeanor” for “a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment of a period of not less than thirty (30) days or not more than six (6) months, or both, in the discretion of the court” in (a).

History.

Acts 1939, No. 12, § 1; 1939, No. 202, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1026.

2-2-202. Penalty.

Any person, firm, or corporation violating any provision of §2-2-201 shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Each violation of any provision of §2-2-201 shall be deemed a separate offense.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 12, § 1-A; 1939, No. 202, § 1-A; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1027; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 330.

Subchapter 3

— Merger and Consolidation

2-2-301. Applicability.

Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, the provisions of this subchapter shall apply exclusively to the merger, consolidation, mortgage, sale, and lease of assets of and by an association subject to the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 121, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1039.

2-2-302. Provisions supplemental.

The provisions of this subchapter shall be supplemental to, and part of, §§ 2-2-101 — 2-2-124, 2-2-201, and 2-2-202, and legislation amendatory and supplemental to these provisions relating to agricultural cooperative associations.

The definitions of terms in § 2-2-102 shall be equally applicable with respect to terms used in this subchapter.

The names of the associations proposing to merge and the name of the association into which they propose to merge, which is designated as the “surviving association”;

The terms and conditions of the proposed merger;

The manner and basis of converting the shares, patronage, or other interests of each merging association into shares or other interests of the surviving association;

A statement of any changes in the articles of incorporation of the surviving association to be affected by the merger;

The time when the merger shall become effective; and

Such other provisions with respect to the proposed merger as are deemed necessary or desirable.

A copy or a summary of the plan of merger or plan of consolidation, as the case may be, shall be included in or enclosed with the notice.

(1)At each meeting, a vote of the members shall be taken on the proposed plan of merger or consolidation.

After approval by a vote of the members of each association and at any time before the filing of the articles of merger or consolidation, the merger or consolidation may be abandoned under provisions, if any, set forth in the plan of merger or consolidation.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 121, § 14; 1985, No. 385, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1040.

2-2-303. Procedure for merger.

Any two (2) or more domestic associations created under §2-2-101 et seq. may merge into one (1) of these associations under a plan of merger approved in the manner provided in this subchapter.

The board of directors of each association shall, by resolution adopted by each board, approve a plan of merger setting forth:

History.

Acts 1981, No. 121, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1028.

2-2-304. Procedure for consolidation.

Any two (2) or more domestic associations created under §2-2-101 et seq. may consolidate into a new association under a plan of consolidation approved in the manner provided in this subchapter.

The board of directors of each association by a resolution adopted by each board shall approve a plan of consolidation setting forth:

The names of the associations proposing to consolidate, and the name of the new association into which they propose to consolidate, which is designated as the “new association”;

The terms and conditions of the proposed consolidation;

The manner and basis of converting the shares, patronage, or other interests of each association into shares or other interests of the new association;

With respect to the new association, all of the statements required to be set forth in articles of incorporation for associations organized under this subchapter;

The time when the consolidation shall become effective; and

Such other provisions with respect to the proposed consolidation as are deemed necessary or desirable.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 121, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1029.

2-2-305. Approval by members — Abandonment.

(1)Upon approving the plan of merger or plan of consolidation, the board of directors of each association by resolution shall direct the plan be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members, which may be either an annual or a special meeting.

(A)Written or printed notice shall be given to each member not less than twenty (20) days before the meeting, in the manner provided in this subchapter for the giving of notice of meetings to members, and shall state the purpose of the meeting, whether the meeting is an annual or a special meeting.

Each member of each association shall be entitled to vote on the proposed plan of merger or consolidation.

The plan of merger or consolidation shall be approved upon receiving the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast at the meeting in which members holding not less than fifty percent (50%) of the voting power of the association are represented in person or by proxy.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 121, § 4; 1983, No. 163, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1030.

2-2-306. Articles of merger or consolidation.

Upon approval, articles of merger or articles of consolidation shall be executed by each association and filed in accordance with this subchapter, which shall be certified by the president and secretary of each association signing them and shall set forth:

The plan of merger or the plan of consolidation, including the time when it shall become effective;

As to each association:

The number of shares or memberships outstanding or votes entitled to be cast; and

If the shares or members of any class are entitled to vote as a class, the designation in number of outstanding shares or memberships or votes entitled to be cast by each class; and

As to each association:

The number of votes cast for and against the plan, respectively; and

If any shares of any class of stock are entitled to vote as a class, the number of shares or votes of each class voted for and against the plan, respectively.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 121, § 5; 1983, No. 163, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1031.